Hawaii statutes.
§334-22 Penalty. Any person who and
any association or corporation which establishes, maintains, or operates a
psychiatric facility for compensation or hire without holding a valid license
issued under this part, and any officer of any association or corporation who
participates in the violation, shall be fined not more than $1,000 or, in the
case of an individual, imprisoned not more than six months, or both. [L 1967, c
259, pt of §1; HRS §334-22]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, 663.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next